Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202585-1008
Nebraska Safety Center Advisory Council; membership; termination.

(1) To assist the center in carrying out its purposes and functions prior to July 1, 2026, the Board of Regents may establish a Nebraska Safety Center Advisory Council composed of the following members:

(a) One representative from the Department of Transportation;

(b) One representative from the Department of Motor Vehicles;

(c) One representative from the State Department of Education;

(d) One representative from the Game and Parks Commission;

(e) One representative from the Department of Labor;

(f) One person representing the community college areas;

(g) One person representing private business and industry;

(h) One person representing the University of Nebraska;

(i) One person representing the medical profession;

(j) One person representing the area of law enforcement in this state;

(k) One person representing the Safety Council of Nebraska, Inc.;

(l) One person representing the area of transportation;

(m) One person representative of emergency medical services;

(n) One person representing the judiciary in the State of Nebraska;

(o) One person representing city government;

(p) One person representing county government;

(q) One person representing the area of agriculture;

(r) One person representing the local public school system;

(s) One person representing fire safety;

(t) One representative of the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary Education;

(u) One person representing the Red Cross; and

(v) One person representing the state colleges.

(2) Representatives selected to serve on the council shall have appropriate education, training, and experience in the field of fire safety, industrial safety, recreational safety, domestic safety, or traffic safety.

(3) The Nebraska Safety Center Advisory Council terminates on July 1, 2026. This section terminates on July 1, 2026.

Laws 1978, LB 693, § 8;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 124;

Laws 1994, LB 683, § 14;

Laws 2009, LB299, § 1;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 295;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 62.